District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-214.02

Funeral expenses — Payment permitted.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1402, 29 DCR 1060
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 13, 36 DCR 492
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 101, 43 DCR 2978
1981 Ed., § 3-214.2.
For temporary repeal of section, see § 2(b) of the Emergency and Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-277, May 29, 1996, 43 DCR 2971).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-335, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4256).